Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1103
Trial, defined.

A trial is a judicial examination of the issues, whether of law or of fact in an action.

R.S.1867, Code § 279, p. 440;

R.S.1913, § 7842;

C.S.1922, § 8786;

C.S.1929, § 20-1103;

R.S.1943, § 25-1103.

Hearing on a motion to dissolve an attachment is a trial. J. R. Watkins Co. v. Sorenson, 166 Neb. 364, 88 N.W.2d 902 (1958).

A trial is a judicial examination of the issues, whether of law or fact. Krepcik v. Interstate Transit Lines, 151 Neb. 663, 38 N.W.2d 533 (1949).

Where court decides case upon merits, after introduction of evidence, it is a trial. Shipley v. McNeel, 149 Neb. 790, 32 N.W.2d 639 (1948).

Hearing of motion to dissolve an attachment is a trial. Gibson v. Sidney, 50 Neb. 12, 69 N.W. 314 (1896).

Trial of an impeachment does not include preferring of charges. State v. Hill, 37 Neb. 80, 55 N.W. 794 (1893).